District of Columbia statutes.
31-4329

Disposition of premiums paid to agents.

An insurance agent, solicitor, or broker who acts in negotiating or renewing or continuing a contract of insurance for a company lawfully doing business in the District, and who receives any money or substitute for money as a premium for such a contract from the insured, whether he shall be entitled to an interest in same or otherwise, shall be deemed to hold such premium in trust for the company making the contract. If he fails to pay the same over to the company after written demand made upon him therefor, such failure shall be prima facie evidence that he has used or applied the said premium for a purpose other than paying the same over to the company, and upon conviction thereof he shall be deemed guilty of theft and punished accordingly.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1142, ch. 672, ch. II, § 30
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 15, 30 DCR 3341

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-429.
1973 Ed., § 35-429.